Ohio, session 136, HB401.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 5.2323 of the Revised Code be 3
enacted to read as follows: 4
Sec. 5.2323. The month of May is designated as "Myositis 5
Awareness Month" in recognition of the following: 6
(A) Idiopathic inflammatory myopathies, collectively 7
referred to as myositis, are rare, chronic autoimmune muscle- 8
wasting diseases that often feature debilitating muscle 9
inflammation and other symptoms such as pain, fatigue, and 10
trouble swallowing, and can result in myositis-associated 11
interstitial lung disease. 12
(B) Myositis contributes to a reduced quality of life and 13
lifespan. 14
(C) Myositis is difficult to diagnose, and more research 15
is needed to identify the causes of, and treatments for, the 16
myositis group of diseases. 17